Utah statutes.
78B-16-109.   Warrant to take physical custody of child.
(1)  If a petition under this chapter contains allegations, and the court
finds that there is a credible risk that the child is imminently likely to be
wrongfully removed, the court may issue an ex parte warrant to take physical
custody of the child.
(2)  The respondent on a petition under Subsection (1) must be afforded an
opportunity to be heard at the earliest possible time after the ex parte
warrant is executed, but not later than the next judicial day unless a hearing
on that date is impossible.  In that event, the court shall hold the hearing
on the first judicial day possible.
(3)  An ex parte warrant under Subsection (1) to take physical custody of a
child must:
(a)  recite the facts upon which a determination of a credible risk of
imminent wrongful removal of the child is based;
(b)  direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child
immediately;
(c)  state the date and time for the hearing on the petition; and
(d)  provide for the safe interim placement of the child pending further order
of the court.
(4)  If feasible, before issuing a warrant and before determining the
placement of the child after the warrant is executed, the court may order a
search of the relevant databases of the National Crime Information Center
system and similar state databases to determine if either the petitioner or
respondent has a history of domestic violence, stalking, or child abuse or
neglect.
(5)  The petition and warrant must be served on the respondent when or
immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.
(6)  A warrant to take physical custody of a child, issued by this state or
another state, is enforceable throughout this state.  If the court finds that
a less intrusive remedy will not be effective, it may authorize law
enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the
child.  If required by exigent circumstances, the court may authorize law
enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.
(7)  If the court finds, after a hearing, that a petitioner sought an ex parte
warrant under Subsection (1) for the purpose of harassment or in bad faith,
the court may award the respondent reasonable attorney fees, costs, and other
reasonable expenses and losses arising out of the issuance of the ex parte
warrant.
(8)  This chapter does not affect the availability of relief allowed under the
law of this state other than this chapter.
